Florida, session 2026, HB7001.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 16.716, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
16.716 Florida Gaming Control Commission public records
and public meetings exemptions.—
(1)(a) Any information obtained by the Florida Gaming
Control Commission which is exempt or confidential and exempt
from s. 119.07(1) or s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution
shall retain its exempt or confidential and exempt status. The
information may be released by the commission, upon written
request, to an agency, as defined in s. 119.011, or a
governmental entity in the performance of the commission's
official duties and responsibilities. An agency or a
governmental entity receiving such information from the
commission shall maintain the exempt or confidential and exempt
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7001-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7001 2026
status of the information.
(2)(b)1. Any portion of a meeting of the commission during
which information that is exempt or confidential and exempt is
discussed is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the
State Constitution.
(a)a. The chair of the commission shall advise the
commission at a public meeting that, in connection with the
performance of a commission duty, it is necessary that the
commission hear or discuss information that is exempt or
confidential and exempt.
(b)b. The chair's declaration of necessity for closure and
the specific reasons for such necessity shall be stated in
writing in a record that shall be a public record and shall be
filed with the official records of the commission.
(c)c. The entire closed session shall be recorded. The
recording shall include the times of commencement and
termination of the closed session, all discussion and
proceedings, and the names of all persons present. No portion of
the session may be off the record. Such recording shall be
maintained by the commission.
(d)2. Only members of the commission, Department of Legal
Affairs staff, or commission staff supporting the commission's
function and other persons whose presence is necessary for the
presentation of exempt or confidential and exempt information
shall be allowed to attend the exempted portions of the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7001-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7001 2026
commission meetings. The commission shall ensure that any
closure of its meetings as authorized by this subsection
paragraph is limited so that the general policy of this state in
favor of public meetings is maintained.
(e)3. A recording of, and any minutes and records
generated during, that portion of a commission meeting which is
closed to the public pursuant to this subsection paragraph are
confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I
of the State Constitution until such time as the information is
no longer exempt or confidential and exempt.
(2) This section is subject to the Open Government Sunset
Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and is repealed on
October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through
reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7001-00